Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5319.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-21-54 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-21 entitled "Retirement
of Municipal Employees" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-21-54. Reemployment of retired members.
Any retired member of the system is permitted to reenter the service of the system for not
more than seventy-five (75) working days in a calendar year without interruption of pension
benefits. Pension payments, however, are suspended when that period is exceeded. This seventy-
five-day (75) rule shall not apply to police officers, as defined in § 28-9.2-3, or any peace officer
as defined in § 12-7-21, working in a Rhode Island school as a full or part-time school resource
officer, for the purposes of their working private details, paid for by a nongovernmental entity. If
the retired member continues in service beyond the seventy-five-day (75) period (with his or her
annuity temporarily suspended) the member is not eligible for pension credit for the additional
service, nor is the member required to make pension contributions for this service; provided, that
any retired member of the system is permitted to serve as an elected city or town council member
or school committee member and continues to be eligible for and receive the retirement allowance
for service other than that as a council member or school committee member.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001081
========